Florida, session 2026, HB7017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
15
16 Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 119.0715, Florida
17 Statutes, is amended to read:
18 119.0715 Trade secrets held by an agency.—
19 (5) OPEN GOVERNMENT SUNSET REVIEW.—This section is subject
20 to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s.
21 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless
22 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
23 Legislature.
24 Section 2. Paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of section
25 287.137, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
26 287.137 Antitrust violations; denial or revocation of the
27 right to transact business with public entities; denial of
28 economic benefits.—
29 (8)
30 (d) For purposes of this subsection, the term "proprietary
31 business information" means information that:
32 1. Is owned or controlled by the business;
33 2. Is intended to be private and is treated by the
34 business as private because disclosure would harm the business
35 or its business operations;
36 3. Has not been disclosed except as required by law or a
37 private agreement that provides that the information will not be
38 released to the public;
39 4. Is not publicly available or otherwise readily
40 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the
41 same configuration as received by the Attorney General; and
42 5. Includes:
43 a. Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
44 b. competitive interests, the disclosure of which would
45 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the
46 subject of the information.
47 Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) and subsection
48 (3) of section 288.075, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
49 288.075 Confidentiality of records.—
50 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
51 (c) "Trade secret" has the same meaning as in s. 688.002.
52 (3) TRADE SECRETS.—Trade secrets held by an economic
53 development agency are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1)
54 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
55 Section 4. Subsection (4) of section 334.049, Florida
56 Statutes, is amended to read:
57 334.049 Patents, copyrights, trademarks; notice to
58 Department of State; confidentiality of trade secrets.—
59 (4) Any information obtained by the department as a result
60 of research and development projects and revealing a method of
61 process, production, or manufacture which is a trade secret as
62 defined in s. 688.002, is confidential and exempt from the
63 provisions of s. 119.07(1).
64 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 408.185, Florida
65 Statutes, is amended to read:
66 408.185 Information submitted for review of antitrust
67 issues; confidentiality.—The following information held by the
68 Office of the Attorney General, which is submitted by a member
69 of the health care community pursuant to a request for an
70 antitrust no-action letter shall be confidential and exempt from
71 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
72 Constitution for 1 year after the date of submission.
73 (1) Documents that reveal trade secrets as defined in s.
74 688.002.
75 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 409.91196, Florida
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
76 Statutes, is amended to read:
77 409.91196 Supplemental rebate agreements; public records
78 and public meetings exemption.—
79 (1) The rebate amount, percent of rebate, manufacturer's
80 pricing, and supplemental rebate, and other trade secrets as
81 defined in s. 688.002 that the agency has identified for use in
82 negotiations, held by the Agency for Health Care Administration
83 under s. 409.912(5)(a)7. are confidential and exempt from s.
84 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
85 Section 7. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
86 440.108, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
87 440.108 Investigatory records relating to workers'
88 compensation employer compliance; confidentiality.—
89 (2) After an investigation is completed or ceases to be
90 active, information in records relating to the investigation
91 remains confidential and exempt from the provisions of s.
92 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution if
93 disclosure of that information would:
94 (b) Reveal a trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002;
95 Section 8. Subsection (4) of section 497.172, Florida
96 Statutes, is amended to read:
97 497.172 Public records exemptions; public meetings
98 exemptions.—
99 (4) TRADE SECRETS.—Trade secrets, as defined in s.
100 688.002, held by the department or board, are confidential and
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
101 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
102 Constitution.
103 Section 9. Paragraph (d) of subsection (11) of section
104 501.171, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
105 501.171 Security of confidential personal information.—
106 (11) PUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.—
107 (d) For purposes of this subsection, the term "proprietary
108 information" means information that:
109 1. Is owned or controlled by the covered entity.
110 2. Is intended to be private and is treated by the covered
111 entity as private because disclosure would harm the covered
112 entity or its business operations.
113 3. Has not been disclosed except as required by law or a
114 private agreement that provides that the information will not be
115 released to the public.
116 4. Is not publicly available or otherwise readily
117 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the
118 same configuration as received by the department.
119 5. Includes:
120 a. Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
121 b. competitive interests, the disclosure of which would
122 impair the competitive business of the covered entity who is the
123 subject of the information.
124 Section 10. Paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section
125 501.1735, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
126 501.1735 Protection of children in online spaces; public
127 records exemption.—
128 (6) PUBLIC RECORDS EXEMPTION.—
129 (d) For purposes of this section, the term "proprietary
130 information" means information that:
131 1. Is owned or controlled by the online platform.
132 2. Is intended to be private and is treated by the online
133 platform as private because disclosure would harm the online
134 platform or its business operations.
135 3. Has not been disclosed except as required by law or a
136 private agreement that provides that the information will not be
137 released to the public.
138 4. Is not publicly available or otherwise readily
139 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the
140 same configuration as received by the department.
141 5. Includes:
142 a. Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
143 b. competitive interests, the disclosure of which would
144 impair the competitive advantage of the online platform who is
145 the subject of the information.
146 Section 11. Paragraph (d) of subsection (10) of section
147 501.2041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
148 501.2041 Unlawful acts and practices by social media
149 platforms.—
150 (10)
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
151 (d) For purposes of this subsection, the term "proprietary
152 business information" means information that:
153 1. Is owned or controlled by the business;
154 2. Is intended to be private and is treated by the
155 business as private because disclosure would harm the business
156 or its business operations;
157 3. Has not been disclosed except as required by law or a
158 private agreement that provides that the information will not be
159 released to the public;
160 4. Is not publicly available or otherwise readily
161 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the
162 same configuration as received by the department; and
163 5. Includes:
164 a. Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
165 b. competitive interests, the disclosure of which would
166 impair the competitive advantage of the business that is the
167 subject of the information.
168 Section 12. Paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of section
169 501.722, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
170 501.722 Public records exemption.—
171 (4) For purposes of this section, the term "proprietary
172 information" means information that:
173 (e) Includes:
174 1. Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
175 2. competitive interests, the disclosure of which would
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
176 impair the competitive advantage of the controller, processor,
177 or third party who is the subject of the information.
178 Section 13. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
179 520.9965, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
180 520.9965 Confidentiality of information relating to
181 investigations and examinations.—
182 (1)
183 (b) Except as necessary for the office to enforce the
184 provisions of this chapter, a consumer complaint and other
185 information relative to an investigation or examination shall
186 remain confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) after the
187 investigation or examination is completed or ceases to be active
188 to the extent disclosure would:
189 1. Jeopardize the integrity of another active
190 investigation or examination.
191 2. Reveal the name, address, telephone number, social
192 security number, or any other identifying number or information
193 of any complainant, customer, or account holder.
194 3. Disclose the identity of a confidential source.
195 4. Disclose investigative techniques or procedures.
196 5. Reveal a trade secret as defined in s. 688.002.
197 Section 14. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
198 548.062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
199 548.062 Public records exemption.—
200 (1) As used in this section, the term "proprietary
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
201 confidential business information" means information that:
202 (e) Concerns any of the following:
203 1. The number of ticket sales for a match;
204 2. The amount of gross receipts after a match;
205 3. A trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002;
206 3.4. Business plans;
207 4.5. Internal auditing controls and reports of internal
208 auditors; or
209 5.6. Reports of external auditors.
210 Section 15. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
211 559.5558, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
212 559.5558 Public records exemption; investigations and
213 examinations.—
214 (2)
215 (b) Information made confidential and exempt pursuant to
216 this section is no longer confidential and exempt once the
217 investigation or examination is completed or ceases to be active
218 unless disclosure of the information would:
219 1. Jeopardize the integrity of another active
220 investigation or examination.
221 2. Reveal the personal identifying information of a
222 consumer, unless the consumer is also the complainant. A
223 complainant's personal identifying information is subject to
224 disclosure after the investigation or examination is completed
225 or ceases to be active. However, a complainant's personal
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
226 financial and health information remains confidential and
227 exempt.
228 3. Reveal the identity of a confidential source.
229 4. Reveal investigative or examination techniques or
230 procedures.
231 5. Reveal trade secrets, as defined in s. 688.002.
232 Section 16. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
233 569.215, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
234 569.215 Confidential records relating to tobacco
235 settlement agreement.—
236 (2) As used in this section, the term "proprietary
237 confidential business information" means information, regardless
238 of form or characteristics, which is owned or controlled by a
239 tobacco company that is a signatory to the settlement agreement,
240 as amended, in the case of State of Florida v. American Tobacco
241 Company, No. 95-1466AH, in the Circuit Court of the Fifteenth
242 Judicial Circuit, in and for Palm Beach County, is intended to
243 be and is treated by a tobacco company as private in that the
244 disclosure of the information would cause harm to the company's
245 business operations, and has not been disclosed unless disclosed
246 pursuant to a statutory provision, an order of a court or
247 administrative body, or private agreement that provides that the
248 information will not be released to the public. The term
249 includes, but is not limited to:
250 (a) Trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002.
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
251 Section 17. Paragraph (g) of subsection (3) of section
252 627.0628, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
253 627.0628 Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection
254 Methodology; public records exemption; public meetings
255 exemption.—
256 (3) ADOPTION AND EFFECT OF STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES.—
257 (g)1. A trade secret, as defined in s. 688.002, which is
258 used in designing and constructing a hurricane or flood loss
259 model and which is provided pursuant to this section, by a
260 private company, to the commission, office, or consumer advocate
261 appointed pursuant to s. 627.0613 is confidential and exempt
262 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
263 Constitution.
264 1.2.a. That portion of a meeting of the commission or of a
265 rate proceeding on an insurer's rate filing at which a trade
266 secret, as defined in s. 688.002, which is used in designing and
267 constructing a hurricane or flood loss model and which is
268 provided pursuant to this section, by a private company, to the
269 commission, office, or consumer advocate appointed pursuant to
270 s. 627.0613 made confidential and exempt by this paragraph is
271 discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the
272 State Constitution. The closed meeting must be recorded, and no
273 portion of the closed meeting may be off the record.
274 2.b. The recording of a closed portion of a meeting is
275 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7017 2026
276 Constitution.
277 Section 18. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) and subsection
278 (4) of section 1004.4472, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
279 1004.4472 Florida Institute for Human and Machine
280 Cognition, Inc.; public records exemption; public meetings
281 exemption.—
282 (2) The following information held by the corporation or
283 its subsidiary is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
284 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
285 (a) Material relating to methods of manufacture or
286 production, potential trade secrets, patentable material, actual
287 trade secrets as defined in s. 688.002 or proprietary
288 information received, generated, ascertained, or discovered
289 during the course of research conducted by or through the
290 corporation or a subsidiary, and business transactions resulting
291 from such research.
292 (4) That portion of a meeting of the corporation or a
293 subsidiary at which information is presented or discussed which
294 is confidential and exempt pursuant to subsection (2) or s.
295 119.0715 is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the
296 State Constitution.
297 Section 19. This act shall take effect upon becoming a
298 law.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7017-00